Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

1-13.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Local Government Election Code".

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 5, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-102. Applicability of article - legislative intent.

This article applies only to nonpartisan elections not coordinated by county clerk and recorders that are conducted by a local government; except that nothing prohibits the governing body of a local government from utilizing any requirements and procedures of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title, in accordance with section 1-13.5-106.

It is the general assembly's intent that the "Uniform Election Code of 1992" continue to govern coordinated elections.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 5, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 13.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Absentee voter" means an eligible elector who requests in writing that the designated election official mail a ballot to either the elector's deliverable mailing address or to another address designated by the elector for the purpose of voting by mail.

(1.5) "Affidavit" means a sworn statement in writing, including a self-affirmation.

"Designated election official" means the person designated by the governing body of a local government or by court order to supervise election duties.

"Electronic voting system" means a system in which an elector votes using a device by which votes are recorded electronically, including a touchscreen system.

"Eligible elector" means a person who meets the specific requirements for voting at a specific election conducted under this article or for a specific candidate, ballot question, or ballot issue.

"Issue committee" has the meaning set forth in section 1-45-103.

"Local government" means any district, business improvement district, special district created pursuant to title 32, C.R.S., authority, or political subdivision of the state, authorized by law to conduct an election. "Local government" does not include a county, school district, regional transportation district, or municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.

"Pollbook" means the list of eligible electors who are permitted to vote at a polling place or by mail ballot at an election conducted pursuant to this article.

"Polling place" means a place established for holding elections conducted under this article.

"Property owners list" means the list of property owner names and addresses prepared by the county assessor in accordance with section 1-13.5-204 or 1-13.5-1105 (2)(a) and (2)(b).

"Registration list" means the list of registered electors of each local government, as prepared by the county clerk and recorder for the county in which the local government is located or as obtained through state registration records in accordance with section 1-13.5-203.

"Special district" means any public entity, as defined in section 24-10-103, C.R.S., that is authorized by law to hold an election; except that the term does not include a county, a municipality as defined in section 31-1-101, C.R.S., or a school district as defined in section 22-30-103, C.R.S.

"Voter" means an eligible elector who voted in the most recent election conducted pursuant to this article.

"Voting machine" means any device fulfilling the requirements for voting machines set forth in part 4 of article 7 of this title regarding its use, construction, procurement, and trial.

"Watcher" means a registered elector of the local government whose name is submitted to the designated election official and certified by the designated election official to the appropriate election judges pursuant to section 1-13.5-602.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 6, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1.5) added, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1266, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

IP and (9) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 536, § 1, effective September 7.

1-13.5-104. Acts and elections conducted pursuant to provisions that refer to qualified electors.

Any elections, and any acts relating thereto, carried out under law that were conducted prior to July 1, 1987, pursuant to provisions that referred to a qualified elector rather than an eligible elector and that were valid when conducted are deemed and held to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 7, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-105. Acts legal and valid.

Acts and elections conducted pursuant to provisions that refer to registered electors, any elections, and any acts relating to those elections carried out under law that were conducted prior to July 1, 1992, and that were valid when conducted are held to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 7, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-106. Applicability of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992".

Any local government may provide by resolution that it will utilize all or part of the requirements and procedures of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title, in lieu of all or portions of this article with respect to any election. Absent such resolution, this article applies.

All provisions of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992" not in conflict with this article 13.5 apply to local government elections; except that:

Elections offenses and penalties described by parts 2 and 3 of article 13 of this title 1 do not apply to elections authorized under this article 13.5;

Except as provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section, recall elections of local government officers must be conducted pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of title 31; and

Recall elections of directors of special districts created pursuant to title 32 and directors of business improvement districts who were elected pursuant to section 31-25-1209 (1)(d) must be conducted pursuant to part 9 of article 1 of title 32.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the general provisions of this article not supersede or supplant specific provisions of law.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 7, § 6, effective February 18; (2) amended, (SB 14-158), ch.170, p. 623, § 14, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 754, § 5, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1306, § 4, effective May 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-13.5-107. Computation of time.

Calendar days shall be used in all computations of time made under this article.

In computing time for any act or event to be done before any local government election, the first day is excluded, and the last, or election, day is included. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are included, but, if the time for any act to be done or the last day of any period is a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the period is extended to include the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 7, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 536, § 2, effective September 7.

1-13.5-108. Powers of designated election official.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the designated election official shall render all interpretations and shall make all initial decisions as to controversies or other matters arising in the operation of this article.

All powers and authority granted to the designated election official by this article may be exercised by a deputy designated election official in the absence of the designated election official or in the event the designated election official is unable to perform the duties.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 8, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-109. Construction.

Substantial compliance with the provisions or intent of this article is all that is required for the proper conduct of an election to which this article applies.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 8, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-110. Special elections.

Special elections must be held on such date as may be provided by law by the local government calling the special election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 8, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-111. Time for holding elections for special districts - type of election - manner of election - notice.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, regular special district elections must be held on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of May in every odd-numbered year.

Special elections may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February, May, October, or December of any year; except that ballot issue elections may be held only on the date of a state general election, biennial local district election, or on the first Tuesday in November of odd-numbered years. A ballot issue election that is not part of an organizational election must be conducted either as part of a coordinated election or in accordance with part 11 of this article.

Any special district election ordered pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., by the district court having jurisdiction over such existing or proposed special district must be held on the date ordered by the court and conducted in accordance with this article.

Whenever the date of a regular special district election is identical to the date set for a municipal or another special district election in any municipality or other special district having boundaries coterminous with the special district, the election may be held jointly with the municipal or other special district election. An election held jointly pursuant to this subsection (4) is not a coordinated election.

Any election for the organization of a new health assurance or health service district must be held on the date of the general election or on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year. Any election on the proposal of a health assurance or health service district must be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in which the proposed district will be located as part of a coordinated election in accordance with section 1-7-116.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 8, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1039), ch. 29, p. 330, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

1-13.5-112. Commencement of terms - nonpartisan officers.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the regular term of office of a nonpartisan officer elected at a regular election commences the earlier of the following:

No later than thirty days after the date that the election results are certified pursuant to section 1-13.5-1305 and upon the signing of an oath and posting of a bond, where required; or

At the next meeting of the governing body of the local government following the date of the election.

Unless otherwise provided by law, if the election is canceled in whole or in part pursuant to section 1-13.5-513, the regular term of office of a nonpartisan officer commences at:

The next meeting of the governing body following the date of the regular election, but no later than thirty days following the date of the regular election and upon the signing of an oath and posting of a bond, where required; or

If the nonpartisan officer was elected at an election other than a regular election, the next meeting of the governing body of the local government following the date of the election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 9, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1266, § 2, effective August 10.